lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5621 Y 2
SFX 5621 kti ko/429 . 302
SFX 5621 ktis kosi/429 . 302

SFX 5622 Y 2
SFX 5622 kti ko/430 . 302
SFX 5622 ktis kosi/430 . 302

SFX 5623 Y 2
SFX 5623 kti ko/431 . 302
SFX 5623 ktis kosi/431 . 302

SFX 5627 Y 2
SFX 5627 sti sti/408 . 300
SFX 5627 stis stis/408 . 300

SFX 5628 Y 2
SFX 5628 sti sti/409 . 300
SFX 5628 stis stis/409 . 300

SFX 5629 Y 2
SFX 5629 sti sti/410 . 300
SFX 5629 stis stis/410 . 300

SFX 5630 Y 2
SFX 5630 sti sti/411 . 300
SFX 5630 stis stis/411 . 300

SFX 5631 Y 2
SFX 5631 sti sti/412 . 300
SFX 5631 stis stis/412 . 300

SFX 5632 Y 2
SFX 5632 sti sti/413 . 300
SFX 5632 stis stis/413 . 300

SFX 5633 Y 2
SFX 5633 sti sti/414 . 300
SFX 5633 stis stis/414 . 300

SFX 5634 Y 2
SFX 5634 sti sti/415 . 300
SFX 5634 stis stis/415 . 300

SFX 5635 Y 2
SFX 5635 sti sti/416 . 300
SFX 5635 stis stis/416 . 300

SFX 5636 Y 2
SFX 5636 sti sti/417 . 300
SFX 5636 stis stis/417 . 300

SFX 5647 Y 2
SFX 5647 sti čia/418 . 301
SFX 5647 stis čiasi/418 . 301

SFX 5648 Y 2
SFX 5648 sti čia/419 . 301
SFX 5648 stis čiasi/419 . 301

SFX 5649 Y 2
SFX 5649 sti čia/420 . 301
SFX 5649 stis čiasi/420 . 301

SFX 5650 Y 2
SFX 5650 sti čia/421 . 301
SFX 5650 stis čiasi/421 . 301

SFX 5651 Y 2
SFX 5651 sti čia/422 . 301
SFX 5651 stis čiasi/422 . 301

SFX 5652 Y 2
SFX 5652 sti čia/423 . 301
SFX 5652 stis čiasi/423 . 301

SFX 5653 Y 2
SFX 5653 sti čia/424 . 301
SFX 5653 stis čiasi/424 . 301

SFX 5654 Y 2
SFX 5654 sti čia/425 . 301
SFX 5654 stis čiasi/425 . 301

SFX 5655 Y 2
SFX 5655 sti čia/426 . 301
SFX 5655 stis čiasi/426 . 301

SFX 5665 Y 1
SFX 5665 sti tie/427 . 301

SFX 5666 Y 1
SFX 5666 stis tie/428 . 301

SFX 5667 Y 2
SFX 5667 sti tė/429 . 302
SFX 5667 stis tėsi/429 . 302

SFX 5668 Y 2
SFX 5668 sti tė/430 . 302
SFX 5668 stis tėsi/430 . 302

SFX 5669 Y 2
SFX 5669 sti tė/431 . 302
SFX 5669 stis tėsi/431 . 302

SFX 5673 Y 2
SFX 5673 sti sti/408 . 300
SFX 5673 stis stis/408 . 300

SFX 5674 Y 2
SFX 5674 sti sti/409 . 300
SFX 5674 stis stis/409 . 300

SFX 5675 Y 2
SFX 5675 sti sti/410 . 300
SFX 5675 stis stis/410 . 300

SFX 5676 Y 2
SFX 5676 sti sti/411 . 300
SFX 5676 stis stis/411 . 300

SFX 5677 Y 2
SFX 5677 sti sti/412 . 300
SFX 5677 stis stis/412 . 300

SFX 5678 Y 2
SFX 5678 sti sti/413 . 300
SFX 5678 stis stis/413 . 300

SFX 5679 Y 2
SFX 5679 sti sti/414 . 300
SFX 5679 stis stis/414 . 300

SFX 5680 Y 2
SFX 5680 sti sti/415 . 300
SFX 5680 stis stis/415 . 300

SFX 5681 Y 2
SFX 5681 sti sti/416 . 300
SFX 5681 stis stis/416 . 300

SFX 5682 Y 2
SFX 5682 sti sti/417 . 300
SFX 5682 stis stis/417 . 300

SFX 5693 Y 2
SFX 5693 sti sta/418 . 301
SFX 5693 stis stasi/418 . 301

SFX 5694 Y 2
SFX 5694 sti sta/419 . 301
SFX 5694 stis stasi/419 . 301

SFX 5695 Y 2
SFX 5695 sti sta/420 . 301
SFX 5695 stis stasi/420 . 301

SFX 5696 Y 2
SFX 5696 sti sta/421 . 301
SFX 5696 stis stasi/421 . 301

SFX 5697 Y 2
SFX 5697 sti sta/422 . 301
SFX 5697 stis stasi/422 . 301

SFX 5698 Y 2
SFX 5698 sti sta/423 . 301
SFX 5698 stis stasi/423 . 301

SFX 5699 Y 2
SFX 5699 sti sta/424 . 301
SFX 5699 stis stasi/424 . 301

SFX 5700 Y 2
SFX 5700 sti sta/425 . 301
SFX 5700 stis stasi/425 . 301

SFX 5701 Y 2
SFX 5701 sti sta/426 . 301
SFX 5701 stis stasi/426 . 301

SFX 5711 Y 1
SFX 5711 sti stie/427 . 301

SFX 5712 Y 1
SFX 5712 stis stie/428 . 301

SFX 5713 Y 2
SFX 5713 sti do/429 . 302
SFX 5713 stis dosi/429 . 302

SFX 5714 Y 2
SFX 5714 sti do/430 . 302
SFX 5714 stis dosi/430 . 302

SFX 5715 Y 2
SFX 5715 sti do/431 . 302
SFX 5715 stis dosi/431 . 302

SFX 5719 Y 2
SFX 5719 auti auti/408 . 300
SFX 5719 autis autis/408 . 300

SFX 5720 Y 2
SFX 5720 auti auti/409 . 300
SFX 5720 autis autis/409 . 300

SFX 5721 Y 2
SFX 5721 auti auti/410 . 300
SFX 5721 autis autis/410 . 300

SFX 5722 Y 2
SFX 5722 auti auti/411 . 300
SFX 5722 autis autis/411 . 300

SFX 5723 Y 2
SFX 5723 auti auti/412 . 300
SFX 5723 autis autis/412 . 300

SFX 5724 Y 2
SFX 5724 auti auti/413 . 300
SFX 5724 autis autis/413 . 300

SFX 5725 Y 2
SFX 5725 auti auti/414 . 300
SFX 5725 autis autis/414 . 300

SFX 5726 Y 2
SFX 5726 auti auti/415 . 300
SFX 5726 autis autis/415 . 300

SFX 5727 Y 2
SFX 5727 auti auti/416 . 300
SFX 5727 autis autis/416 . 300

SFX 5728 Y 2
SFX 5728 auti auti/417 . 300
SFX 5728 autis autis/417 . 300

SFX 5739 Y 2
SFX 5739 auti auna/418 . 301
SFX 5739 autis aunasi/418 . 301

SFX 5740 Y 2
SFX 5740 auti auna/419 . 301
SFX 5740 autis aunasi/419 . 301

SFX 5741 Y 2
SFX 5741 auti auna/420 . 301
SFX 5741 autis aunasi/420 . 301

SFX 5742 Y 2
SFX 5742 auti auna/421 . 301
SFX 5742 autis aunasi/421 . 301

SFX 5743 Y 2
SFX 5743 auti auna/422 . 301
SFX 5743 autis aunasi/422 . 301

SFX 5744 Y 2
SFX 5744 auti auna/423 . 301
SFX 5744 autis aunasi/423 . 301

SFX 5745 Y 2
SFX 5745 auti auna/424 . 301
SFX 5745 autis aunasi/424 . 301

SFX 5746 Y 2
SFX 5746 auti auna/425 . 301
SFX 5746 autis aunasi/425 . 301

SFX 5747 Y 2
SFX 5747 auti auna/426 . 301
SFX 5747 autis aunasi/426 . 301

SFX 5757 Y 1
SFX 5757 auti aunie/427 . 301

SFX 5758 Y 1
SFX 5758 autis aunie/428 . 301

SFX 5759 Y 2
SFX 5759 auti ovė/429 . 302
SFX 5759 autis ovėsi/429 . 302

SFX 5760 Y 2
SFX 5760 auti ovė/430 . 302
SFX 5760 autis ovėsi/430 . 302

SFX 5761 Y 2
SFX 5761 auti ovė/431 . 302
SFX 5761 autis ovėsi/431 . 302

SFX 5765 Y 2
SFX 5765 erti erti/408 . 300
SFX 5765 ertis ertis/408 . 300

SFX 5766 Y 2
SFX 5766 erti erti/409 . 300
SFX 5766 ertis ertis/409 . 300

SFX 5767 Y 2
SFX 5767 erti erti/410 . 300
SFX 5767 ertis ertis/410 . 300

SFX 5768 Y 2
SFX 5768 erti erti/411 . 300
SFX 5768 ertis ertis/411 . 300

SFX 5769 Y 2
SFX 5769 erti erti/412 . 300
SFX 5769 ertis ertis/412 . 300

SFX 5770 Y 2
SFX 5770 erti erti/413 . 300
SFX 5770 ertis ertis/413 . 300

SFX 5771 Y 2
SFX 5771 erti erti/414 . 300
SFX 5771 ertis ertis/414 . 300

SFX 5772 Y 2
SFX 5772 erti erti/415 . 300
SFX 5772 ertis ertis/415 . 300

SFX 5773 Y 2
SFX 5773 erti erti/416 . 300
SFX 5773 ertis ertis/416 . 300

SFX 5774 Y 2
SFX 5774 erti erti/417 . 300
SFX 5774 ertis ertis/417 . 300

SFX 5785 Y 2
SFX 5785 erti eria/418 . 301
SFX 5785 ertis eriasi/418 . 301

SFX 5786 Y 2
SFX 5786 erti eria/419 . 301
SFX 5786 ertis eriasi/419 . 301

SFX 5787 Y 2
SFX 5787 erti eria/420 . 301
SFX 5787 ertis eriasi/420 . 301

SFX 5788 Y 2
SFX 5788 erti eria/421 . 301
SFX 5788 ertis eriasi/421 . 301

SFX 5789 Y 2
SFX 5789 erti eria/422 . 301
SFX 5789 ertis eriasi/422 . 301

SFX 5790 Y 2
SFX 5790 erti eria/423 . 301
SFX 5790 ertis eriasi/423 . 301

SFX 5791 Y 2
SFX 5791 erti eria/424 . 301
SFX 5791 ertis eriasi/424 . 301

SFX 5792 Y 2
SFX 5792 erti eria/425 . 301
SFX 5792 ertis eriasi/425 . 301

SFX 5793 Y 2
SFX 5793 erti eria/426 . 301
SFX 5793 ertis eriasi/426 . 301

SFX 5803 Y 1
SFX 5803 erti erie/427 . 301

SFX 5804 Y 1
SFX 5804 ertis erie/428 . 301

SFX 5805 Y 2
SFX 5805 erti ėrė/429 . 302
SFX 5805 ertis ėrėsi/429 . 302

SFX 5806 Y 2
SFX 5806 erti ėrė/430 . 302
SFX 5806 ertis ėrėsi/430 . 302

SFX 5807 Y 2
SFX 5807 erti ėrė/431 . 302
SFX 5807 ertis ėrėsi/431 . 302

SFX 5811 Y 2
SFX 5811 bti bti/408 . 300
SFX 5811 btis btis/408 . 300

SFX 5812 Y 2
SFX 5812 bti bti/409 . 300
SFX 5812 btis btis/409 . 300

SFX 5813 Y 2
SFX 5813 bti bti/410 . 300
SFX 5813 btis btis/410 . 300

SFX 5814 Y 2
SFX 5814 bti bti/411 . 300
SFX 5814 btis btis/411 . 300

SFX 5815 Y 2
SFX 5815 bti bti/412 . 300
SFX 5815 btis btis/412 . 300

SFX 5816 Y 2
SFX 5816 bti bti/413 . 300
SFX 5816 btis btis/413 . 300

SFX 5817 Y 2
SFX 5817 bti bti/414 . 300
SFX 5817 btis btis/414 . 300

SFX 5818 Y 2
SFX 5818 bti bti/415 . 300
SFX 5818 btis btis/415 . 300

SFX 5819 Y 2
SFX 5819 bti bti/416 . 300
SFX 5819 btis btis/416 . 300

SFX 5820 Y 2
SFX 5820 bti bti/417 . 300
SFX 5820 btis btis/417 . 300

SFX 5831 Y 2
SFX 5831 bti mba/418 . 301
SFX 5831 btis mbasi/418 . 301

SFX 5832 Y 2
SFX 5832 bti mba/419 . 301
SFX 5832 btis mbasi/419 . 301

SFX 5833 Y 2
SFX 5833 bti mba/420 . 301
SFX 5833 btis mbasi/420 . 301

SFX 5834 Y 2
SFX 5834 bti mba/421 . 301
SFX 5834 btis mbasi/421 . 301

SFX 5835 Y 2
SFX 5835 bti mba/422 . 301
SFX 5835 btis mbasi/422 . 301

AF 5581,5582,5601,5621,9999 # 83
AF 5811,5812,5831,5851,9999 # 110
AF 5719,5720,5739,5759,9999 # 128
AF 5765,5766,5785,5805,9999 # 132
AF 5673,5674,5693,5713,9999 # 143
AF 5627,5628,5647,5667,9999 # 144
AF 5719,5720,5721,5724,5739,5740,5743,5759,9999 # 375
