lt-LT.dic
aptikti/83	11
atgrubti/110	11
atsitverti/132	13
atsišauti/128	13
atsišviesti/144	13
beaptikti/83	11
gerti/132	11
išdribti/110	11
išdrikti/83	11
išklysti/143	11
iškviesti/144	11
išpjauti/128	11
ištikti/83	11
juosti/143	11
kibtis/110	13
kuisti/144	11
mautis/128	13
neapsmukti/83	33
neapšlubti/110	33
neatkakti/83	33
neatklysti/143	33
neatsigerti/132	34
neatsikeisti/144	34
neatsipjauti/128	34
nebeišsitekti/83	34
nebeišversti/144	33
nebeišverti/132	33
nebeiššauti/128	33
nebejuosti/143	33
nebenustebti/110	33
nebepakakti/83	33
nebepasiklysti/143	34
nebepaversti/144	33
nebeperplauti/128	33
nebesekti/83	33
nebesišviesti/144	34
nebeskausti/143	33
nebestverti/132	33
nebesukrauti/128	33
nebesužibti/110	33
nebetekti/83	33
negerti/132	33
neglebti/110	33
neišgirsti/143	33
neišpjauti/128	33
neišriesti/144	33
neišsmukti/83	33
nejuosti/143	33
nekibti/110	33
nenukrauti/128	33
nenusibosti/143	34
nenusitverti/132	34
nenusišveisti/144	34
nepakibti/110	33
nepaklysti/143	33
nepamauti/128	33
nepasiversti/144	34
nepasmirsti/143	33
nepasprukti/83	33
nepašerti/132	33
neperspjauti/128	33
neprigerti/132	33
nepriplūsti/143	33
neprisiliesti/144	34
nesimauti/128	34
nesišerti/132	34
nesuglebti/110	33
nesukaisti/144	33
nesuplukti/83	33
nesusigėsti/143	34
nesusikibti/110	34
netverti/132	33
neužkibti/110	33
neužkrauti/128	33
neužsiriesti/144	34
neužtekti/83	33
neįsitverti/132	34
nudribti/110	11
nuklysti/143	11
nukrauti/128	11
nusišveisti/144	13
nuverti/132	11
pakakti/83	11
pakibti/110	11
pamauti/128	11
pasiklysti/143	13
pasikviesti/144	13
perpjauti/128	11
persiverti/132	13
prikrauti/128	11
prikviesti/144	11
prisižerti/132	13
pritikti/83	11
rausti/143	11
sugrubti/110	11
sukuisti/144	11
sumauti/375	11
susikrauti/128	13
susizgribti/110	13
susmirsti/143	11
sutrikti/83	11
sutverti/132	11
teapsiversti/144	13
tebesmukti/83	11
tebesužibti/110	11
tebežerti/132	11
tepakibti/110	11
tepasigirsti/143	13
teprisiliesti/144	13
tesukakti/83	11
tešerti/132	11
trukti/83	11
užšauti/128	11
įgerti/132	11
įširsti/143	11
žlibti/110	11
